Utah statutes.
32B-6-405.   Specific licensing requirements for club license.

(1)  To obtain a club license, in addition to complying with Chapter 5, Part 2, Retail Licensing Process, a person shall submit with the written application:

(a) (i)  a statement as to whether the person is seeking to qualify as:

(A)  an equity club licensee;

(B)  a fraternal club licensee;

(C)  a dining club licensee; or

(D)  a social club licensee; and

(ii)  evidence that the person meets the requirements for the type of club license for which the person is applying;

(b)  evidence that the person operates club premises where a variety of food is prepared and served in connection with dining accommodations; and

(c)  if the person is applying for an equity club license or fraternal club license, a copy of the club's bylaws or house rules, and an amendment to those records.

(2)  The commission may refuse to issue a club license to a person for an equity club license or fraternal club license if the commission determines that a provision of the person's bylaws or house rules, or amendments to those records is not:

(a)  reasonable; and

(b)  consistent with:

(i)  the declared nature and purpose of the club licensee; and

(ii)  the purposes of this part.

(3) (a)  A club license expires on June 30 of each year.

(b)  To renew a club license, a person shall comply with the requirements of Chapter 5, Part 2, Retail Licensing Process, by no later than May 31.

(4) (a)  The nonrefundable application fee for a club license is $300.

(b)  The initial license fee for a club license is $2,750.

(c)  The renewal fee for a club license is $2,000.

(5)  The bond amount required for a club license is the penal sum of $10,000.



Amended by Chapter 307, 2011 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 334, 2011 General Session

